Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Chapter 09. Homestead Act.

Administrative Code. —

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

Collateral references. —

73B C.J.S., Public Lands, § 62 et seq.

Sec. 38.09.010.
Designation of land for homestead entry.

The commissioner shall designate and make available for homestead entry state land, including, after consulting with the Board of Agriculture and Conservation (AS

03.09.010

), land classified for agricultural use. State land made available for homestead entry under this chapter shall be distributed throughout the state.

The commissioner shall complete a rectangular survey grid of homestead entry state land under AS

38.04.045

before disposing of state land for homestead entry. A homestead entry parcel shall be established in aliquot parts of a surveyed section or as lots or tracts that are fractions of aliquot parts of a surveyed section. The commissioner shall ensure practical access to each homestead entry parcel but the commissioner may waive the rectangular survey grid if no more than one conveyance is made for each section within a township.

Notice of the designation and offering of land for homestead entry shall be given by the commissioner under AS

38.05.945

.

Land designated for homestead entry is not subject to a preference right under AS 38.05.

The commissioner shall prescribe a homestead entry procedure for each area designated under (a) of this section. The homestead entry procedure shall establish

the minimum distance between homestead entries in the area;

the dimensions, configuration, orientation, or other design requirements for a homestead entry in the area;

a description of land within the area that may not be included in a homestead entry;

a requirement that a landmark, monument, or other point be used as a point of reference for the measurement of distances within an area;

a specification of the type of stakes to be used to mark the corners of a homestead entry;

the time within which a homestead entry must be staked.

The commissioner shall establish the maximum size of a homestead entry that may be selected in each area designated under (a) of this section except that the commissioner may not permit an entry on more than

160 acres of land classified for agricultural use; or

40 acres of land not classified for agricultural use.

The commissioner may limit the number of persons permitted to obtain homestead entries within an area designated under (a) of this section by a lottery of qualified applicants.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983; am § 52 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 123 SLA 1988; am § 32 ch 91 SLA 1997; am § 28 ch 81 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

Sec. 38.09.020.
Homestead entry permits.

A homestead entry permit entitles an applicant to enter land within an area designated under AS

38.09.010

and to survey, occupy, and improve the land in order to qualify for a patent under this chapter.

An applicant for a homestead entry permit shall personally stake the corners and flag the boundaries of the land entered under this chapter and shall personally file with the commissioner a description of the land entered. A homestead entry shall be described by aliquot parts unless otherwise permitted by the commissioner. The commissioner may require the applicant to establish a deposit for the costs of survey before issuing the homestead entry permit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 123 SLA 1988; am § 15 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

Sec. 38.09.030.
Qualification for homestead entry.

An applicant for a homestead entry permit shall

submit proof acceptable to the commissioner that the applicant is at least 18 years of age and has been a resident of the state for not less than one year immediately before the date of application;

pay a fee of $5 per acre according to the description provided by the applicant if the entry is on land classified agricultural, or $10 per acre if the entry is on land not classified agricultural;

agree to comply with the requirements of AS

38.09.050

;

certify that the corners of the land entered have been staked and the boundaries have been flagged;

assume full responsibility for the accuracy of the description of the land filed with the commissioner under AS

38.09.020(b)

.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, an applicant may not hold more than one homestead entry permit at one time and may not receive a patent to more than one homestead entry in a lifetime.

The homestead entry permit may not be assigned, conveyed, or in any manner transferred except

by testate or intestate succession;

to a spouse during marriage;

by order of a court as part of a divorce settlement;

to either a member of the immediate family or a grantee of the applicant in the case of an extreme emergency or illness which disables the applicant; or

after the approval of the commissioner, by an exchange between parties in the same homestead area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983; am § 13 ch 75 SLA 1987; am § 33 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

Sec. 38.09.040.
Revocation of entry permits.

A homestead entry permit may be revoked by the commissioner for a substantial breach of the permit conditions or the requirements of this chapter, including

an assignment, conveyance, or transfer of the permit not authorized under AS

38.09.030(c)

;

failure of the permit holder to submit an aliquot parts description of the homestead entry or, a plat of survey where the commissioner waived the requirement of a rectangular survey grid to the commissioner within five years after the issuance of the permit;

[Repealed, § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997.]

failure to brush the boundaries of the land not described by aliquot parts or as a lot of record within 90 days after issuance of the homestead entry permit;

failure to clear and either put into production or prepare for cultivation either 25 percent of the land classified for agricultural use or 50 percent of the cropland soils, whichever is less, within five years after the issuance of the permit.

[Repealed, § 20 ch 75 SLA 1987.]

If a homestead entry permit is revoked under (a) of this section, improvements or personal property upon the land shall be managed under AS

38.05.090

and the state land remains available for homestead entry under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983; am §§ 14, 20 ch 75 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 123 SLA 1988; am § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

Sec. 38.09.050.
Issuance of patent.

The commissioner shall issue a patent to homestead entry land if the permit holder

resides and lives on the homestead entry land for not less than 25 months within five years after the issuance of the homestead entry permit;

submits an aliquot parts description or completes an approved survey of the land in an area where the commissioner waives the rectangular survey grid within five years after the issuance of the permit;

[Repealed, § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997.]

brushes the boundaries of the land not described by aliquot parts or as a lot of record within 90 days after the issuance of the permit;

clears and either puts into production or prepares for cultivation either 25 percent of the land classified for agricultural use or 50 percent of the cropland soils, whichever is less, within five years after issuance of the permit.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits a homestead entry permit holder from residing in a temporary dwelling on the homestead.

The commissioner may reserve or exclude from a patent easements or rights-of-way for roads, trails, trap lines, public access ways, utility corridors, and transportation facilities.

[Repealed, § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997.]

[Repealed, § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983; am § 53 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 15 ch 75 SLA 1987; am § 6 ch 123 SLA 1988; am §§ 34, 38 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

Sec. 38.09.060.
Marking boundaries.

If it is impractical to brush the boundaries of a homestead entry, an applicant shall flag the boundaries.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983)

Administrative Code. —

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

Sec. 38.09.070.
Priority of applications.

The commissioner shall issue a homestead entry permit to the first applicant for land to comply with AS

38.09.020(b)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983)

Sec. 38.09.080.
Land within municipalities.

If a municipality has filed a selection of state land under AS 29.65 or former AS 29.18.201 — 29.18.213 with the commissioner, the state land selected may not be designated for homestead entry; if the commissioner determines that land selected by a municipality is not available for patent to the municipality under AS 29.65 or former AS 29.18.201 — 29.18.213, the state land is available for designation by the commissioner for homestead entry under AS

38.09.010

.

The disposal of homestead entry land is subject to local platting, recording, or subdivision requirements established under AS

29.35.180

and AS 40.15.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983; am § 61 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 38.09.090.
Purchase.

If an applicant complies with the requirements of AS

38.09.050(a)(2)

, (4), and (5) and pays to the commissioner an amount equal to five percent of the fair market value within two years of the issuance of an entry permit, an applicant may purchase the land under AS

38.05.065

. The purchase price is the fair market value of the land at the issuance of the entry permit as determined by the commissioner.

An applicant who complies with AS

38.09.050(a)(2)

, (4), and (5), and who tenders the commissioner an amount equal to five percent of the present fair market value of the land within five years of the issuance of the permit may purchase the land under AS

38.05.065

. The purchase price is the fair market value of the land at the time of the purchase.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983; am § 54 ch 152 SLA 1984; am § 35 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For reservations to which contracts for sale of and deeds to state land are subject, see AS

38.05.125

.

Administrative Code. —

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

Sec. 38.09.100.
Lessees of remote parcels.

A lessee of a remote parcel under former AS

38.05.077

may elect to obtain title to the remote parcel under AS

38.09.050

. If a lessee of a remote parcel elects to obtain title under AS

38.09.050

, July 28, 1983, shall be considered the date of the issuance of the homestead entry permit.

Except as provided in (a) of this section, nothing in this chapter affects the rights and obligations of lessees of remote parcels under former AS

38.05.077

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of former AS

38.05.077

and 38.05.078, the heirs or devisees of a deceased lessee of a remote parcel may sell their interest in the lease of the remote parcel. The sellers shall notify the commissioner of the sale.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 1987; am § 66 ch 14 SLA 1987)

Editor’s notes. —

AS

38.05.077

, referred to in two places in this section, was repealed by § 7, ch. 103, SLA 1983.

Sec. 38.09.105.
Removal of conditions on remote parcel and homestead entry land.

The commissioner may not include the conditions of former AS 38.05.078(d) in a remote parcel purchase contract issued on or after July 1, 1997.

The commissioner shall amend a remote parcel or homestead entry land purchase contract or patent issued before July 1, 1997 to remove the conditions of former AS 38.05.078(d) or former AS

38.09.050(e)

if the holder of the purchase contract or patent

requests the amendment;

pays the reasonable administrative costs of the amendment as determined by the commissioner; and

pays the difference, as established by the commissioner, between the land’s fair market value before the amendment and the estimated fair market value after the amendment.

History.

(§ 36 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Sec. 38.09.110.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

Sec. 38.09.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“brush” means to clear a swath along the boundary lines of a homestead entry so that the boundary lines may be identified from the ground;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“resident” means an individual who has resided in the state for one year, is a U.S. citizen and does not claim residence in another state, and shows by all attending circumstances an intent to make this state the individual’s permanent residence.

History.

(§ 1 ch 103 SLA 1983; am § 38 ch 91 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (3) was formerly paragraph (5).
Renumbered in 2010 to reflect the 1997 repeal of former paragraphs (3) and (4).